Hawaii statutes.
[§173A-6] Acquisition of land. The
board shall prepare an annual program for the purchase or acquisition by
eminent domain of land having value as a resource to the State. [L 1973, c 77,
§6]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next